test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-saami_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - säämi: # i-stems
    säämi+N+Sg+Nom: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Gen: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Acc: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Ill: sáámán
    säämi+N+Sg+Loc: säämist
    säämi+N+Sg+Com: saamijn
    säämi+N+Sg+Abe: sämittáá
    säämi+N+Ess: säämmin
    säämi+N+Par: säämmid
    säämi+N+Pl+Nom: säämih
    säämi+N+Pl+Gen: saamij
    säämi+N+Pl+Acc: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Ill: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Loc: saamijn
    säämi+N+Pl+Com: samijguin
    säämi+N+Pl+Abe: samijttáá
